Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-288
User, defined.

User means any person or entity who:

(1) Uses an electronic communication service; and

(2) Is duly authorized by the provider of such service to engage in such use.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 150.